West Virginia, session 2026, HB4313.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 9 - 1. Board of Pharmacy. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-5-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Pharmacy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 22, 2025, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (pharmacists, 15 CSR 16), is authorized.